tr: Uyumlu oyuncak araç ölçeği: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Evrensel/Ölçeğe özel değil; Diğer
it: Scala del veicolo giocattolo compatibile: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universale/non specifica per scala; Altro
nb: Kompatibel lekekjøretøy-skala: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universell / ikke skalaspesifikk; Annet
sl-SI: Združljivo merilo igrače vozila: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Univerzalno/ni vezano na merilo; Drugo
ja: 対応プレイ車両スケール: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; ユニバーサル/スケール指定なし; その他
bg-BG: Съвместим мащаб на превозните средства за игра: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Универсален/Без специфичен мащаб; Друго
en: Compatible play vehicle scale: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universal/Not scale-specific; Other
da: Kompatibel skala for legekøretøj: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universel/ikke specifik for skala; Andet
ko: 호환 장난감 차 스케일: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; 범용/스케일 무관; 기타
sv: Kompatibel lekfordonsskala: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universell/ej skalspecifik; Övrigt
zh-TW: 相容遊戲車輛比例: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; 通用/無特定比例; 其他
fr: Échelle des véhicules de jeu compatibles: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universelle/non spécifique à l'échelle; Autre
de: Kompatibler Spielfahrzeug-Maßstab: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universal/Nicht maßstabsgebunden; Sonstige
cs: Měřítko kompatibilních autíček: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Univerzální / nezávisí na měřítku; Jiné
ro-RO: Scara vehiculului de jucărie compatibilă: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universal / nespecific pentru o scală; Altele
th: มาตราส่วนรถของเล่นที่เข้ากันได้: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; อเนกประสงค์/ไม่ระบุสเกล; อื่นๆ
vi: Tỷ lệ mô hình xe đồ chơi tương thích: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Phổ thông/Không theo tỷ lệ cụ thể; Khác
pl: Zgodna skala pojazdu do zabawy: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Uniwersalna / Niespecyficzna dla skali; Inne
fi: Yhteensopiva leluajoneuvon mittakaava: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Yleinen / ei skaalakohtainen; Muu
ru: Совместимый масштаб игрушечного транспортного средства: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Универсальный / не зависит от масштаба; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilan omjer igračke vozila: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Univerzalno / nije specifično za mjerilo; Ostalo
es: Escala de vehículo de juguete compatible: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universal/no específico de escala; Otro
zh-CN: 兼容游戏车辆比例: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; 通用/非特定比例; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilná mierka hračkárskeho autíčka: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Univerzálne/bez špecifickej mierky; Iné
nl: Compatibele speelvoertuigschaal: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universeel/niet schaalspecifiek; Overig
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio žaislinė transporto priemonė: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universalus / nepriklauso nuo mastelio; Kita
pt-PT: Escala do veículo de brincar compatível: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universal/sem escala específica; Outro
el: Συμβατή κλίμακα οχήματος παιχνιδιού: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Γενικής χρήσης/Μη ειδικής κλίμακας; Άλλο
pt-BR: Escala de veículos de brinquedo compatíveis: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Universal/sem escala específica; Outra
hu: Kompatibilis játékjármű mérete: 1:100; 1:12; 1:120; 1:144; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:43; 1:50; 1:55; 1:64; 1:87; Univerzális/nem méretarány-specifikus; Egyéb